Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2602.03
Judicial proceeding; award of costs and expenses; authorized.

In any judicial proceeding involving the appointment of a guardian or a conservator, the administration of a guardianship or conservatorship, or an accounting for a guardianship or a conservatorship, the court, as justice and equity may require, may award costs and expenses, including reasonable attorney's fees, to any party, to be paid by another party or from the trust that is the subject of the controversy.

Laws 2026, LB985, § 7.
July 18, 2026